Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 5

Tennessee Condominium Act of 2008 — Units Restricted to Residential Purposes

66-27-501. Applicability — Waiver.

This part applies only to units restricted to residential purposes, unless expressly made applicable by the declaration.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-502. Responsibility to provide information.

The association, upon request from a unit owner, a purchaser or any lender to either a unit owner or a purchaser, or their respective authorized agents, shall provide to the requesting party, within ten (10) business days following the date of the association's receipt of the request, the information specified in § 66-27-503, to the extent applicable. It shall be the responsibility of a unit owner to advise a purchaser or lender, upon request, how the association may be contacted. The association will be entitled to charge a reasonable fee for providing the information that, if not paid, may be assessed against the unit whose owner, lender, or purchaser requested the information.

When construction of a condominium is not yet complete, a declarant, prior to the first sale of any interest in a unit to a third-party purchaser, shall upon request, and within ten (10) business days following the date of the declarant's receipt of the request, provide the information specified in § 66-27-503, to the extent applicable and to the extent available, to any purchaser or prospective lender to a purchaser. If any of the information is not available within ten (10) business days following the date of the request, then it shall be provided at least ten (10) business days prior to closing of the sale of the unit.

The party requesting the information shall be entitled to rely on the information provided, unless the party has actual knowledge to the contrary.

Any request to be made or information to be provided under this part shall be provided in writing or by electronic means, which may include, without limitation, by email or posting to a web site and providing a link and access to the web site.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-503. Information to be provided — General.

The information to be provided pursuant to §66-27-502 shall include the following:

The name and principal address of the declarant, during the period of declarant control only, the association, and the condominium;

A copy of the recorded, or if not recorded then in substantially final form to the extent available, master deed or declaration, bylaws, charter or articles of association of the association, and all amendments of and exhibits to the master deed or declaration, bylaws, charter or articles of association of the association;

A copy of the current rules and regulations of the association;

The most recent balance sheet, income statement, and approved budget for the association, or, if there has never been an approved budget, then the projected budget. The budget must include, without limitation:

A statement of the amount, or a statement that there is no amount, included in the budget as a reserve for repairs and replacements, and whether or not any study has been done to determine their adequacy, and if a study has been done, where the study will be made available for review and inspection;

A statement of any other reserves;

The projected aggregate annual common expense assessment by category of expenditures for the association;

The projected monthly common expense assessment, or the method of calculating each unit's share of the assessment, for each type of unit;

A description of any indebtedness secured by the common elements or other amenities owned by the association or available for the use of the unit owners; and

A description of any lease affecting the common elements or amenities owned by the association or available for the use of the unit owners;

Minutes of all meetings of the members and/or the board of directors of the association for the twenty-four-month period ending on the date of the request;

The current monthly assessment and any special assessment applicable to the unit in question, and the amount of any delinquencies in any assessments applicable to the unit;

Any fees or assessments due as a result of a transfer of the applicable unit;

The amount and nature of any additional fees currently imposed for use by members of the common elements or other amenities;

A statement of the insurance coverage, which may be provided in the form of an appropriate certificate from the insurer, maintained by the association that includes the types of coverage, limits and deductibles of the insurance;

A statement of any unsatisfied judgments and a description of any pending suits against the association;

A description of any pending suits filed by the association, other than for the collection of delinquent assessments;

The total amount of current monthly, annual, or special assessments for all units in the condominium that are more than sixty (60) days past due as of the most recent available report, but in no event more than ninety (90) days prior to the date of the request; and

Whether the board of directors is still under declarant control and, if so, when that period of control ends.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

Cross-References. Insurance, §66-27-413.

66-27-504. Declarant liability.

If the declarant prepared or caused to be prepared all or a part of the information required by this part, the declarant may be held liable for any materially false or misleading statement, or for any material omission of any required information, with respect to that portion of the information that the declarant prepared. The declarant shall not be liable for:

Any false or misleading information or for any omission of material fact unless the declarant had actual knowledge of the statement or omission, or, in the exercise of reasonable care, should have known of the statement or omission; or

Following the end of the period of declarant control, failure of the association to provide information under § 66-27-503 that was prepared by the declarant.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-505. Remedies for noncompliance.

If the association or declarant, as applicable, fails to provide the information required by § 66-27-503, within the time provided in this section, then the association or declarant, as applicable, shall be liable for and shall pay a fine or penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the party on whose behalf the request is made, following the first request for the information, and a fine or penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) if not supplied within ten (10) business days following the second request for the information, plus all costs, including, without limitation, reasonable attorney's fees incurred in obtaining the information or enforcing the fines or penalties, or both, provided for in this section.

In addition, and not in limitation of subdivision (a)(1), neither the purchaser nor any unit owned by the purchaser, shall be liable for any past due assessments that would have been disclosed if the information would have been provided within ten (10) business days following the second request for the information; provided, that the requesting party had no actual knowledge of the past due assessments at the time the unit was acquired by the purchaser.

The fine or penalty, or both, shall not be the exclusive remedy of the aggrieved party, but shall be in addition to all other remedies to which the party shall be entitled at law or in equity, including, without limitation, specific performance.

If at the time of the request for information the declarant is in control of the association or the condominium, or both, then the declarant must provide the information required within ten (10) business days following receipt of a written request for the information, or, if the information is not available at that time, then within ten (10) business days prior to closing. If the information is not provided within that time, then the prospective buyer shall have the right to rescind the contract upon notice to the declarant, or, in the buyer's sole discretion, the buyer may extend the closing date until a date that is ten (10) business days following the date upon which the information is provided, and may seek specific performance of this obligation in a court of competent jurisdiction, and shall be entitled to recover all costs and expenses incurred in doing so, including, without limitation, reasonable attorney's fees.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-506. Escrow of deposits.

Any deposit made in connection with the purchase or reservation of a unit from a declarant shall be placed in escrow and held in this state in an account designated solely for that purpose by a licensed title insurance company or agent of the licensed title insurance company, an attorney, a licensed real estate broker, or an independent bonded escrow company, and shall be deposited in an institution whose accounts are insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality, or any other lawful escrow or trust account, until:

Delivered to the declarant at closing;

Delivered to the declarant because of purchaser's default under a contract to purchase the unit;

Refunded to the purchaser;

Interpleaded into a court of appropriate jurisdiction; or

Disbursed pursuant to a final order of a court of appropriate jurisdiction.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-507. Conversion buildings.

A declarant of a condominium containing conversion buildings, who offers units in the condominium, shall give each of the residential tenants and any residential subtenant in possession of a portion of a conversion building notice of the conversion no later than sixty (60) days before the tenants and any subtenant in possession are required to vacate. The notice must set forth generally the rights of tenants and subtenants under this section and shall be hand-delivered to the unit or mailed by prepaid United States mail to the tenant and subtenant at the address of the unit or any other mailing address provided by a tenant. No tenant or subtenant may be required to vacate upon less than sixty (60) days notice, except by reason of nonpayment of rent, waste, conduct that disturbs other tenants' peaceful enjoyment of the premises, unlawful conduct, or other breach of a written lease, and the terms of the tenancy may not be altered during that period. Failure to give notice as required by this section is a defense to an action for possession.

Nothing in this section permits termination of a lease by a declarant in violation of its terms.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.